Illinois, session 104th, HB1438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Office of the Independent Corrections 7Ombudsperson for the Office's ordinary and contingent 8expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.